Hawaii, session 2026, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $160,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $168,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the office of enterprise technology services to develop and maintain a website translation tool on the State's website. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________